Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.015

Loans generally—Limitation.

An association may invest not more than twenty percent of its assets in loans on such terms as it deems appropriate.

[ 1982 c 3 s 51.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.